Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1809
Legal Services Fund; created; use;
transfers.

There is hereby created the Legal Services Fund
to be administered by the Director of Administrative Services. All money received
by the Attorney General or directed to be deposited in the fund by any state
agency, board, commission, or constitutional officer or the Legislature pursuant
to section 25-1808 shall be deposited into the fund. At the end of each fiscal
year, the director shall transfer from the fund into the budget of the appropriate
state agency, board, commission, or constitutional office or the Legislature
those fees and expenses that have been awarded by the court. In those instances
when the Attorney General has billed a state agency, board, commission, or
constitutional officer or the Legislature, the money awarded shall be appropriated
to the budget of the Attorney General. The director shall electronically
submit a summary of such transfers to the Legislature at the end
of each fiscal year.

Laws 1993, LB 781, § 2;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 28.